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DTC P2759/68 TorqueConverterClutchPressureControlSolenoid
Control Circuit Electrical(Shift Solenoid Valve SLU)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The amount of current flow to the solenoid is controlled by the
(*) duty ratio of the Engine and ECT ECU output signal. The
higher theduty ratiobecomes, thehigher the lock −uphydraulic
pressurebecomesduring the lock −upoperation.
(*) Duty Ratio
The duty ratio is the ratio of the period of continuity in one cycle.
For example, if A is the period of continuity in one cycle, and B
is theperiodofnon −continuity, then

DTC No. DTC detection condition Trouble Area

P2759/68
The followingcondition isdetected. ( 1−tripdetection logic)
SLUoutputsignal’sdutyONof3.3msec.ormorewithduty
ratioof least95%lasts for 1 second.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check transmission wire.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the transmission wire connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between SLU

+ 
and SLU

− of transmission
wire.
OK:

Resistance: 5.0 − 5.6 � at 20 ˚ C (68 ˚ F)
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals SLU

+ 
and SLU

− of the
transmission wire connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M � or higher

NG Go to step 3.

OK

2 Measure resistance between terminal SLU 
+ 

and SLU
− of Engine and ECT ECU

connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the transmission wire connector.
(b) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals SLU

+ 
and SLU

− of En-
gine and ECT ECU connector.
OK:

Resistance: 5.0 − 5.6 � at 20 ˚ C (68 ˚ F)
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals SLU

+ 
and SLU

− of the
Engine and ECT ECU connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M � or higher

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector
(See page IN−38).

OK

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−38).
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3 Check shift solenoid valve SLU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Remove the shift solenoid valve SLU.
CHECK:
(a) Measure the resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of so-

lenoid connector.
Standard: 5.0 − 5.6 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)

(b) Connect the positive (+) lead with an 21 W bulb to terminal
2 of solenoid connector and negative (−) lead to terminal
1 of the solenoid valve connector, then check the move-
ment of the valve.
Standard: Solenoid sounds operation noise.

OK:
Standard

NG Replace the shift solenoid valve SLU
(See page AT−8) .

OK

Repair or replace the transmission wire
(See page AT−6) .


